Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1515
Candidate filing form; wrongful failure to file; penalty.

Any person who is in possession of any candidate filing form entitled to be filed under the Election Act and who wrongfully suppresses or neglects or willfully fails to file such candidate filing form or fails to cause such candidate filing form to be filed at the proper time in the proper office shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 414.